Washington statutes.
RCW 35.82.330

Chapter not applicable to certain transfers of property.

This chapter does not apply to transfers of property under *sections 1 and 2 of this act.

[ 2006 c 35 s 8.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to "sections 1 and 2 of this act" appears to be erroneous. Reference to "sections 2 and 3 of this act" codified as RCW 43.99C.070 and 43.83D.120 was apparently intended. RCW 43.99C.070 and 43.83D.120 were recodified as RCW 43.83.400 and 43.83.410, respectively, by the code reviser September 2015.

Findings—2006 c 35: See note following RCW 43.83.400.